Maryland, session 2026, SB0853.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
2–207.
(a) For purposes of this section, “person in interest” has the meaning stated in [§
4–101(g)] § 4–101 of the General Provisions Article.
6–410.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Custodian” has the meaning stated in [§ 4–101(d)] § 4–101 of the
General Provisions Article.

SENATE BILL 853 3
(3) “Public record” has the meaning stated in [§ 4–101(j)] § 4–101 of the
General Provisions Article.
Article – Economic Development
TITLE 1.5. GENERAL PROVISIONS.
1.5–101.
(A) THIS TITLE APPLIES TO THE EMPLOYEES OF, CONTRACTORS WITH, AND
CONSULTANTS TO THE DEPARTMENT OR ANY OTHER ENTITY OR PROGRAM
GOVERNED BY THIS ARTICLE.
(B) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, AN INDIVIDUAL
MAY NOT ENTER INTO A NONDISCLOSURE AGREEMENT WITH A PERSON INVOLVED
IN AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ACTIVITY, INCLUDING A PERSON INVOLVED IN
ESTABLISHING OR OPERATING A DATA CENTER AS DEFINED IN § 11–239 OF THE TAX
– GENERAL ARTICLE.
Article – General Provisions
4–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Applicant” means a person or governmental unit that asks to inspect a public
record.
(c) “Board” means the State Public Information Act Compliance Board.
(d) “Custodian” means:
(1) the official custodian; or
(2) any other authorized individual who has physical custody and control
of a public record.
(e) “INSTRUMENTALITY OF THE STATE” INCLUDES A PUBLIC SERVICE
COMPANY AS DEFINED IN § 1–101 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE.
(F) “News media” means:
(1) newspapers;

SENATE BILL 853
(2) magazines;
(3) journals;
(4) press associations;
(5) news agencies;
(6) wire services;
(7) radio;
(8) television; and
(9) any printed, photographic, mechanical, or electronic means of
disseminating news and information to the public.
[(f)] (G) “Official custodian” means an officer or employee of the State or of a
political subdivision who is responsible for keeping a public record, whether or not the
officer or employee has physical custody and control of the public record.
[(g)] (H) “Person in interest” means:
(1) a person or governmental unit that is the subject of a public record or a
designee of the person or governmental unit;
(2) if the person has a legal disability, the parent or legal representative of
the person; or
(3) as to requests for correction of certificates of death under § 5–310(d)(2)
of the Health – General Article, the spouse, adult child, parent, adult sibling, grandparent,
or guardian of the person of the deceased at the time of the deceased’s death.
[(h)] (I) (1) “Personal information” means information that identifies an
individual.
(2) Except as provided in § 4–355 of this title, “personal information”
includes an individual’s:
(i) name;
(ii) address;
(iii) e–mail address;
(iv) driver’s license number or any other identification number;

SENATE BILL 853 5
(v) medical or disability information;
(vi) photograph or computer–generated image;
(vii) Social Security number; and
(viii) telephone number.
(3) “Personal information” does not include an individual’s:
(i) driver’s status;
(ii) driving offenses;
(iii) five–digit zip code; or
(iv) information on vehicular accidents.
[(i)] (J) “Police officer” has the meaning stated in § 3–201 of the Public Safety
Article.
[(j)] (K) “Political subdivision” means:
(1) a county;
(2) a municipal corporation;
(3) an unincorporated town;
(4) a school district; or
(5) a special district.
[(k)] (L) (1) “Public record” means the original or any copy of any
documentary material that:
(i) is made by a unit or an instrumentality of the State or of a
political subdivision or received by the unit or instrumentality in connection with the
transaction of public business; and
(ii) is in any form, including:
1. a card;
2. a computerized record;
3. correspondence;

SENATE BILL 853
4. a drawing;
5. film or microfilm;
6. a form;
7. a map;
8. a photograph or photostat;
9. a recording; or
10. a tape.
(2) “Public record” includes a document that lists the salary of an employee
of a unit or an instrumentality of the State or of a political subdivision.
(3) “Public record” does not include:
(i) a digital photographic image or signature of an individual, or the
actual stored data of the image or signature, recorded by the Motor Vehicle Administration;
or
(ii) a record or any information submitted to the Public Access
Ombudsman or the Board under Subtitle 1B of this title.
[(l)] (M) “Technical infraction” means a minor rule violation by an individual
solely related to the enforcement of administrative rules that:
(1) does not involve an interaction between a member of the public and the
individual;
(2) does not relate to the individual’s investigative, enforcement, training,
supervision, or reporting responsibilities; and
(3) is not otherwise a matter of public concern.
4–103.
(a) All persons are entitled to have access to information about the affairs of
government and the official acts of public officials and employees.
(b) To carry out the right set forth in subsection (a) of this section, unless an
unwarranted invasion of the privacy of a person in interest would result, this title shall be
construed in favor of allowing inspection of a public record, with the least cost and least
delay to the person or governmental unit that requests the inspection.

SENATE BILL 853 7
Article – Health – General
4–217.
(f) The Secretary shall include with every copy of a death certificate that is
completed by the Chief Medical Examiner a notice that advises a person in interest, as
defined in [§ 4–101(g)] § 4–101 of the General Provisions Article, of the right to appeal a
denial by the Chief Medical Examiner of a request to correct findings and conclusions as to
the cause and manner of death recorded on a death certificate as provided under § 5–310(d)
of this article.
Article – Local Government
1–1321.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO:
(1) A GOVERNING BODY; AND
(2) THE EMPLOYEES OF, CONTRACTORS WITH, AND CONSULTANTS TO
A GOVERNING BODY OR ANY OTHER ENTITY OR PROGRAM GOVERNED BY THIS
ARTICLE.
(B) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, AN INDIVIDUAL
MAY NOT ENTER INTO A NONDISCLOSURE AGREEMENT WITH A PERSON INVOLVED
IN AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ACTIVITY, INCLUDING A PERSON INVOLVED IN
ESTABLISHING OR OPERATING A DATA CENTER AS DEFINED IN § 11–239 OF THE TAX
– GENERAL ARTICLE.
Article – State Government
2–1703.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO:
(1) A LEGISLATOR; AND
(2) AN EMPLOYEE OF, CONTRACTOR WITH, AND CONSULTANT TO A
LEGISLATOR OR THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
(B) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, AN INDIVIDUAL
MAY NOT ENTER INTO A NONDISCLOSURE AGREEMENT WITH A PERSON INVOLVED
IN AN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ACTIVITY, INCLUDING A PERSON INVOLVED IN

SENATE BILL 853
ESTABLISHING OR OPERATING A DATA CENTER AS DEFINED IN § 11–239 OF THE TAX
– GENERAL ARTICLE.
Article – Tax – General
11–239.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Data center” means a building or group of buildings used to house
computer systems, computer storage equipment, and associated infrastructure that
businesses or other organizations use to organize, process, store, and disseminate large
amounts of data.
Article – Transportation
12–112.
(d) (1) (i) In this subsection the following terms have the meanings
indicated.
(ii) “Personal information” has the meaning indicated in [§ 4–101(g)]
§ 4–101 of the General Provisions Article.
(iii) “Telephone solicitation” has the meaning indicated in § 4–320(a)
of the General Provisions Article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.